src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 413K2
 +Inf:%>ye # ;
 +Inf:%>ya # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>yas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>yande # ;

LEXICON 413KL
 +Inf:%>ye # ;
 +Inf:%>ya # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>yast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>yande # ;

LEXICON 414
 +Inf:%>joe # ;
 +Inf:%>joa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>y # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>joast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>joande # ;

LEXICON 414K1
 +Inf:%>joe # ;
 +Inf:%>joa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>y # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>joas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>joande # ;

LEXICON 414K2
 +Inf:%>joe # ;
 +Inf:%>joa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>joas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>joande # ;

LEXICON 414KL
 +Inf:%>joe # ;
 +Inf:%>joa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>joast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>joande # ;

LEXICON 415
 +Inf:%>joe # ;
 +Inf:%>joa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>y # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>joast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>joande # ;

LEXICON 415K1
 +Inf:%>joe # ;
 +Inf:%>joa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>y # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>joas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>joande # ;

LEXICON 415K2
 +Inf:%>joe # ;
 +Inf:%>joa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>joas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>joande # ;

LEXICON 415KL
 +Inf:%>joe # ;
 +Inf:%>joa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>joast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>joande # ;

LEXICON 417
 +Inf:%>ue # ;
 +Inf:%>ua # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>y # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>uast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>uande # ;
 +Imp:%>u # ;

LEXICON 417K1
 +Inf:%>ue # ;
 +Inf:%>ua # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>y # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>uas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>uande # ;
 +Imp:%>u # ;

LEXICON 417K2
 +Inf:%>ue # ;
 +Inf:%>ua # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>uas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>uande # ;
 +Imp:%>u # ;

LEXICON 417KL
 +Inf:%>ue # ;
 +Inf:%>ua # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>uast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>uande # ;
 +Imp:%>u # ;

LEXICON 418
 +Inf:%>ue # ;
 +Inf:%>ua # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>y # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>uast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>uande # ;
 +Imp:%>u # ;

LEXICON 418K1
 +Inf:%>ue # ;
 +Inf:%>ua # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>y # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>uas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>uande # ;
 +Imp:%>u # ;

LEXICON 418K2
 +Inf:%>ue # ;
 +Inf:%>ua # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>uas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>uande # ;
 +Imp:%>u # ;

LEXICON 418KL
 +Inf:%>ue # ;
 +Inf:%>ua # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>yer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>uast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>uande # ;
 +Imp:%>u # ;

LEXICON 419
 +Inf:%>eje # ;
 +Inf:%>eja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ejast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ade # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>at # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>at # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ad # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ade # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ade # ;
 +Adj:%>ejande # ;
 +Imp:%>ej # ;

LEXICON 419K1
 +Inf:%>eje # ;
 +Inf:%>eja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ejas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ade # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>at # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>at # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ad # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ade # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ade # ;
 +Adj:%>ejande # ;
 +Imp:%>ej # ;

LEXICON 41A
 +Inf:%>aas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>es # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ós # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>aes # ;

LEXICON 41AK1
 +Inf:%>aas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ees # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ós # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>aes # ;

LEXICON 41B
 +Inf:%>aas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>es # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ós # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ais # ;

LEXICON 41BK1
 +Inf:%>aas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ees # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ós # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ais # ;

LEXICON 41E
 +Inf:%>ias|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>is # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eis # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ies # ;

LEXICON 41EK1
 +Inf:%>ias|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ies # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eis # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ies # ;

LEXICON 41F
 +Inf:%>ias|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>is # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eis # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>iis # ;

LEXICON 41FK1
 +Inf:%>ias|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ies # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>eis # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>iis # ;

LEXICON 41G
 +Inf:%>gjevast # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>gjevst # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>gavst # ;

LEXICON 41GK1
 +Inf:%>gjevas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>gjevs # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>gavs # ;

LEXICON 41I
 +Inf:%>ejas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>es # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ades # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>as # ;

LEXICON 41J
 +Inf:%>ejas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>es # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ates # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>as # ;

LEXICON 41K
 +Inf:%>jas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>s # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>des # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>s # ;

LEXICON 41L
 +Inf:%>jas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>s # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>tes # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>s # ;

LEXICON 41M
 +Inf:%>øjas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>øs # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>udes # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>us # ;

LEXICON 41N
 +Inf:%>øjas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>øs # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>utes # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>us # ;

LEXICON 41O
 +Inf:%>eas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>es # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ades # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>as # ;

LEXICON 41P
 +Inf:%>ejas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>es # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ades # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>as # ;

LEXICON 41Q
 +Inf:%>eas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>es # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>as # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ues # ;

LEXICON 41QK1
 +Inf:%>eas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ees # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>as # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ues # ;

LEXICON 41R
 +Inf:%>eas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>es # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>as # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>uis # ;

LEXICON 41RK1
 +Inf:%>eas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ees # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>as # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>uis # ;

LEXICON 41U
 +Inf:%>seias|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>seies # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>sagdes # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>sags # ;

LEXICON 41V
 +Inf:%>eas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>es # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>os # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ues # ;

LEXICON 41VK1
 +Inf:%>eas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ees # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>os # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ues # ;

LEXICON 41W
 +Inf:%>eas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>es # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>os # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>uis # ;

LEXICON 41WK1
 +Inf:%>eas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ees # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>os # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>uis # ;

LEXICON 41Z
 +Inf:%>uas|t # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>as # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>utes # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>us # ;
