src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
glupe+V:gl 418 ; ! LEMMA_ID=31304
grupe+V:gr 418 ; ! LEMMA_ID=32982
strupe+V:str 418 ; ! LEMMA_ID=91023
stupe+V:st 418 ; ! LEMMA_ID=91351
støvsuge+V:støvs 418 ; ! LEMMA_ID=91790
suge+V:s 418 ; ! LEMMA_ID=91974
supe+V:s 418 ; ! LEMMA_ID=92216
verje+V:v 419 ; ! LEMMA_ID=110103
gjevast+V:g 41G ; ! LEMMA_ID=123129
